Utah statutes.
16-16-1206.   Winding up.

(1)  A limited cooperative association continues after dissolution only for purposes of winding up its activities.

(2)  In winding up a limited cooperative association's activities, the board of directors shall cause the association to:

(a)  discharge its liabilities, settle and close its activities, and marshal and distribute its assets;

(b)  preserve the association or its property as a going concern for no more than a reasonable time;

(c)  prosecute and defend actions and proceedings;

(d)  transfer association property; and

(e)  perform other necessary acts.

(3)  After dissolution and upon application of a limited cooperative association, a member, or a holder of financial rights, the district court may order judicial supervision of the winding up of the association, including the appointment of a person to wind up the association's activities, if:

(a)  after a reasonable time, the association has not wound up its activities; or

(b)  the applicant establishes other good cause.

(4)  If a person is appointed pursuant to Subsection (3) to wind up the activities of a limited cooperative association, the association shall promptly deliver to the division for filing an amendment to the articles of organization to reflect the appointment.

